Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-151] Perjury. Any person
subject to this chapter who in a judicial proceeding or in a court of justice
conducted under this chapter wilfully and corruptly gives, upon a lawful oath
or in any form allowed by law to be substituted for an oath, any false
testimony material to the issue or matter of inquiry is guilty of perjury and
shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next